Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1206
Musical and amusement organizations; leader; employment.

Every vocal, instrumental, or amusement organization established under sections 18-1201 to 18-1207 shall be under the instruction and guidance of a leader, who may be nominated in the first instance by the organization or association but whose nomination, term of employment, and compensation shall be subject to the approval of the city council or village board of trustees of the city or village that established the organization.

Laws 1915, c. 219, § 3, p. 488;

C.S.1922, § 4473;

C.S.1929, § 18-903;

R.S.1943, § 18-1206;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 80.